apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
	 <pardef n="त/ैं__prn">
      <e><p><l>ुम</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेरा</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ेरी</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>	
      <e><p><l>ुझे</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुझको</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुमने</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ुझ</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ुम्हें</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ुम्हारा</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ुम्हारी</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ुम्हारे</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  
    </pardef> 
    
    
	<pardef n="ह/ैं__prn">
      <e><p><l>म</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>में</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>मको</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>मने</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>मारा</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>मारी</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>मारे</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
    
	<pardef n="आ/ैं__prn">
      <e><p><l>प</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पका</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पको</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पने</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>पकी</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="अ/ैं__prn">
      <e><p><l>पनी</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पना</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पने</l><r>प<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="इस/ैं__prn">
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>की</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>के</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>का</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>को</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>से</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>ने</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>			
		<e><p><l>में</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>			

	</pardef>

    <pardef n="सब__prn">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>के</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>की</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>का</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>को</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ने</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>में</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>से</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="किस/ैं__prn">
	
		<e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>की</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>के</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>का</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>को</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>से</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>ने</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>			

	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="इ/ैं__prn">
		<e><p><l>न</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ने</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नकी</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नके</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नका</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नको</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नसे</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>न्होंने</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
  		<e><p><l>नमें</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>			
		<e><p><l>न्हें</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="कि/ैं__prn">
		<e><p><l>न</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ने</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नकी</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नके</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नका</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नको</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>नसे</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>	
		<e><p><l>न्होंने</l><r>न<s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="frm"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>			

	</pardef>

    <pardef n="यह__prn">       
		 <e><p><l>ह</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
         <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="सब"><i>सब</i><par n="सब__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="तुम"><i>त</i><par n="त/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="आप"><i>आ</i><par n="आ/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="अप"><i>अ</i><par n="अ/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="हम"><i>ह</i><par n="ह/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="इस"><i>इस</i><par n="इस/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="उस"><i>उस</i><par n="इस/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="किस"><i>किस</i><par n="किस/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="जिस"><i>जिस</i><par n="किस/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="किन"><i>कि</i><par n="कि/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="इन"><i>इ</i><par n="इ/ैं__prn"/></e>
	<e lm="उन"><i>उ</i><par n="इ/ैं__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="य"><i>य</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="व"><i>व</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="दूसरे"><i>दूसरे</i><par n="यह__prn"/></e>
